Hawaii statutes.
§664-3 Certificate of boundaries, fee.
The certificates of each commissioner of boundaries shall be made on stamped
paper, furnished by the department of land and natural resources, and each
commissioner of boundaries shall collect and account to the department for the
benefit of the public treasury, $1 for each stamped certificate issued by the
commissioner. [L 1894-5, c 14, §9; RL 1925, §554; RL 1935, §3662; RL 1945,
§10203; RL 1955, §234-3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS
§664-3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next